California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(3) A hearing date, time, and location of the hearing.

(4) The secretary or county agricultural commissioner may, upon determination that a violation has been made in accordance with subdivision (a) above, take any corrective action as specified in this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46016.3.

A person may appeal to the secretary for a hearing under Section 205.668 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations or if aggrieved by any one of the following actions or decisions:

(a) Denial of any registration.

(b) Suspension of any registration.

(c) Revocation of any registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 7.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46016.4.

The appeal shall be submitted to the secretary in writing within the time period provided in the letter of notification of the adverse action or within 30 days of receipt of the letter of notification of the adverse action, whichever is later. The appeal shall be considered filed on the date the appeal is received by the secretary. An adverse action shall become final and nonappealable unless an appeal is timely filed. The secretary’s proceeding shall, insofar as practicable, comply with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that a Department of Food and Agriculture hearing officer may be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 8.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46016.5.

As provided for in regulations adopted by the NOP, the action proposed by an NOP accredited certification agency against a client may be appealed to the secretary for mediation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 18.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46017.

(a) In lieu of prosecution, the secretary or a county agricultural commissioner may levy a civil penalty against any person under the enforcement jurisdiction of the secretary as provided in Section 46000 who violates this act, or any regulation adopted pursuant to this act, or regulations adopted by the NOP, in an amount not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The amount of the penalty assessed for each violation shall be based on the nature of the violation, the seriousness of the effect of the violation on the effectuation of the purposes and provisions of this chapter and the impact of the penalty on the violator, including the deterrent effect on future violations.

(b) (1)Notwithstanding the penalties prescribed
 in subdivision (a), if the secretary or county agricultural commissioner finds that a person or a responsibly connected person knowingly sells or labels a product as organic, in violation of this act, any regulation adopted pursuant to this act, or regulations adopted by the NOP, the secretary or county agricultural commissioner may levy a civil penalty against the person in an amount that is not more than the amount specified in Section 3.91(b)(1)(xxxvi) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations for each violation. For purposes of this section, “responsibly connected” has the same meaning as defined in Section 205.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Notwithstanding the penalties prescribed in subdivision (a), if the secretary or county agricultural commissioner finds that a violation was not intentional, the secretary or county agricultural commissioner may levy a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred
 dollars ($2,500) for each violation.

(c) For a first offense, in lieu of a civil penalty as prescribed in subdivision (a) or (b), the secretary or county agricultural commissioner may issue a notice of violation if they find that the violation is minor.

(d) A person against whom a civil penalty is proposed shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing before the secretary or county agricultural commissioner, upon request made in writing within 30 days after the issuance of the notice of penalty. At the hearing, the person shall be given the right to review the secretary’s or commissioner’s evidence of the violation and the right to present evidence on their own behalf. If no hearing is requested, the civil penalty shall constitute a final and nonreviewable order.

(e) If a hearing is held, review of the final
 decision of the secretary or county agricultural commissioner may be requested in writing by any person, pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 30 days of the date of the final order of the secretary or county agricultural commissioner.

(f) The secretary shall be entitled to receive reimbursement from any organic operation or person that is found in violation of this chapter for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other related costs, including, but not limited to, investigative costs, involved in the enforcement of this chapter.

(g) The secretary shall use all funds received pursuant to this section in accordance with Section 46007.

(h) A civil penalty levied by the secretary pursuant to this section may be recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the state. A civil penalty levied
 by a county agricultural commissioner pursuant to this section may be recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the county. After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided in this section, a county agricultural commissioner, or their representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the commissioner that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, a copy of any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. Pursuant to Section 6103 of the Government Code, no fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(i) The secretary shall maintain in a central location, and make publicly available for inspection and
 copying upon request, a list of all civil penalties levied by the secretary and by each county agricultural commissioner within the past five years, including the amount of each penalty, the person against whom the penalty was levied, and the nature of the violation. Copies of this list shall also be available by mail, upon written request and payment of a reasonable fee, as set by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 9.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46018.1.

The secretary and the county agricultural commissioners may conduct a program of announced and unannounced spot inspections to determine compliance with this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 10.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46018.2.

At the request of a county agricultural commissioner, the district attorney for that county may bring an action to enforce this act and the NOP within the enforcement jurisdiction of that commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46020.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to sell, offer for sale, advertise, or label any product in violation of this act.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person engaged in business as a handler, distributor, or retailer of food who in good faith sells, offers for sale, labels, or advertises any product in reliance on the representations of a producer, processor, or other distributor that the product may be sold as organic, shall not be found to violate this act unless the handler, distributor, or retailer either:

(1) Knew or should have known that the product could not be sold as organic.

(2) Was
 engaged in producing or processing the product.

(3) Prescribed or specified the manner in which the product was produced or processed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 11.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46021.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to certify a product in violation of this act.

(b) It is unlawful for a person to certify a product or company as organic unless duly registered as a certification agency pursuant to this act.

(c) It is unlawful for a person to willfully make a false statement or representation, or knowingly fail to disclose a fact required to be disclosed, in registration for a certification agency pursuant to this act.

(d) In accordance with Section 205.100(c)(2) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a person who makes a false statement to the secretary, a governing state official, or an accredited certifying
 agent shall be subject to Section 1001 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 12.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46022.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to sell, advertise, label, or otherwise represent any product as organic unless duly registered pursuant to Section 46013.1.

(b) It is unlawful for a person to willfully make a false statement or representation, or knowingly fail to disclose a fact required to be disclosed, in registration pursuant to Section 46013.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 13.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46023.

It is unlawful for any person to forge, falsify, fail to retain, fail to obtain, or fail to disclose records pursuant to Section 46028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46024.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to advertise, label, or otherwise represent that any fertilizer or pesticide chemical may be used in connection with the production, processing, or distribution of products sold as organic if that fertilizer or pesticide chemical contains a prohibited material.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to refuse to submit for inspection.

(c) It is unlawful for any person to mislabel any
 organic product.

(d) It is unlawful for any person to alter any organic registration form.

(e) It is unlawful for any person to alter any certification document.

(f) It is unlawful for any person to falsify any document.

(g) It is unlawful for any person to remove a hold off sale or disposal order from any lot of product.

(h) It is unlawful to use the term “transitional organic” in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46027.

No food or product shall be advertised or labeled as “organic when available,” or “better than organic,” or use terminology that leaves in doubt whether the food or product being sold is organic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 14.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46028.

All persons who produce, handle, or retail products that are sold as organic shall keep accurate and specific records as required by the secretary in consultation with the California Organic Products Advisory Committee and as required by the National Organic Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 15.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46029.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any producer, handler, processor, or retailer of products sold as organic shall immediately make available for inspection by, and shall upon request, within 72 hours of the request, provide a copy to, the secretary, the Attorney General, any prosecuting attorney, any governmental agency responsible for enforcing laws related to the production or handling of products sold as organic, of any record required to be kept under this section for purposes of carrying out this act. Records acquired pursuant to this act shall not be public records as that term is defined in Section 7920.530 of the Government Code and shall not be subject to Division 10 (commencing with
 Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) Upon written request of any person that establishes cause for the request, the secretary shall obtain and provide to the requesting party within 10 working days of the request a copy of any of the following records required to be kept under this act that pertain to a specific product sold or offered for sale, and that identify substances applied, administered, or added to that product, except that financial information about an operation or transaction, information regarding the quantity of a substance administered or applied, the date of each administration or application, information regarding the identity of suppliers or customers, and the quantity or price of supplies purchased or products sold shall be removed before disclosure and shall not be released to any person other than persons
 and agencies authorized to acquire records under subdivision (a):

(1) Records of a producer, as described in Section 46028.

(2) Records of a handler, as described in Section 46028, records of previous handlers, if any, and producers as described in Section 46028 without identifying the previous handlers or producers, and, if applicable, records obtained as required in this act.

(3) (A) Records of a retailer, as described in Section 46028, records of previous handlers, if any, and producers as described in Section 46028 without identifying the previous processors, handlers, or producers, and, if applicable, records obtained as required in subdivision (d). This subdivision shall be the exclusive means
 of public access to records required to be kept by producers, processors, handlers, and retailers under this act.

(B) A person required to provide records pursuant to a request under this subdivision, may petition the secretary to deny the request based on a finding that the request is of a frivolous or harassing nature. The secretary may, upon the issuance of this finding, waive the information production requirements of this subdivision for the specific request for information that was the subject of the petition.

(c) Information specified in subdivision (b) that is required to be released upon request shall not be considered a “trade secret” under Section 110165, Section 1060 of the Evidence Code, or the Uniform Trade Secrets Act (Title 5 (commencing with Section 3426) of Part 1 of
 Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(d) The secretary may charge the person requesting records a reasonable fee to reimburse the secretary or the source of the records for the cost of reproducing the records requested.

(e) The secretary shall not be required to obtain records not in the secretary’s possession in response to a subpoena. Prior to releasing records required to be kept pursuant to this act in response to a subpoena, the secretary shall delete any information regarding the identity of suppliers or customers and the quantity or price of supplies purchased or products sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 128.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.5. Direct Marketing [47000. - 47062.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [47000. - 47003.]

47000.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following with regard to the direct marketing of agricultural products:

(a) Direct marketing of agricultural products benefits the agricultural community and the consumer by, among other things, providing an alternative method for growers to sell their products while benefiting the consumer by supplying quality produce at reasonable prices.

(b) Direct marketing is a good public relations tool for the agricultural industry that brings the farmer face-to-face with consumers and other end users.

(c) The direct marketing potential of a wide
 variety of California-produced agricultural products should be maximized and encouraged.

(d) Farm stands allow farmers to sell fresh produce and eggs grown on their farm as well as other food products made with ingredients produced on or near the farm, thus enhancing their income and the local economy.

(e) The permitting, regulating, and operating of certified farmers’ markets provide the essential core and foundation for the creation and operation of additional nonagricultural vending activities that are ancillary but contiguous to the certified farmers’ market, thereby providing a larger community event amenity for business districts and additional revenue for the operators of certified farmers’ markets.

(f) The department should maintain a direct marketing program and encourage the sale and purchase of California-grown fresh produce and other California-produced agricultural products.

(g) It is the intent of the state to promote the purchase and consumption of California-grown produce and to promote access to California-produced agricultural products. Restaurants and nonprofit organizations can assist in bringing California-grown products to all Californians.

(h) A regulatory scheme should be developed that provides the flexibility that will make direct marketing a viable marketing system.

(i) The department should assist producers in organizing certified farmers’ markets, field retail stands, farm stands, community-supported
 agriculture, and other forms of direct marketing by providing technical advice on marketing methods and in complying with the regulations that affect direct marketing programs.

(j) The department is encouraged to establish an ad hoc advisory committee to assist the department in establishing regulations affecting direct marketing of products and to advise the secretary in all matters pertaining to direct marketing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 3.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47000.5.

The following definitions apply to this chapter, unless otherwise specified:

(a) (1) “Agricultural product” means a fresh or processed product produced in California, including fruits, nuts, vegetables, herbs, mushrooms, dairy, shell eggs, honey, pollen, unprocessed bees wax, propolis, royal jelly, flowers, grains, nursery stock, raw sheared wool, livestock meats, poultry meats, rabbit meats, and fish, including shellfish that is produced under controlled conditions in waters located in California.

(2) Products that are characterized as services, arts, crafts, bakery, candies, soaps, balms, perfumes, cosmetics, pottery, clothing,
 fabrics, pastas, compost, fertilizers, candles, ceramics, foraged foods, and types of wares are not agricultural products for purposes of this chapter. A product that combines an agricultural product with a nonagricultural product or service in a manner that materially increases the purchase price of the product shall disqualify the product from being sold as an agricultural product for purposes of this chapter.

(b) “Practice of the agricultural arts” means the undertaking of being predominantly responsible for the decisions and actions encompassing the various phases of producing an agricultural product. The practice of the agricultural arts for fruit, floral, nut, vegetable, and other plant products includes directive or actual responsibility for all the actions of planting, growing, fertilizing, irrigating, cultivating, pest control, and
 harvesting. The practice of the agricultural arts for agricultural animal products includes directive or actual responsibility for a substantial time of the raising, feeding, veterinary care, and product harvesting.

(c) “Producer” means a person, partnership, corporation, or an otherwise legally formed farm or ranch that produces agricultural products by the practice of the agricultural arts upon land that the person or entity owns, rents, leases, sharecrops, or otherwise controls and has the documented legal right to possession. A person or entity that rents, leases, or otherwise acquires the right to possession of property essentially only for or limited to the period of the harvest season of the agricultural products produced on that property shall not be considered a producer under the provisions of this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2324)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

47001.

(a) The secretary may adopt regulations to encourage the direct sale by farmers to the public of all types of California agricultural products. It is the intent of the Legislature that, in adopting those regulations, the secretary shall endeavor to keep costs incurred by farmers and certified farmers’ market operators to a minimum, recognizing that any administrative costs imposed on farmers and certified farmers’ market operators are generally passed on in the form of increased prices to the public, thus economically benefiting neither the public nor the farmer.

(b) In accordance with the intent expressed in subdivision (a), the secretary may adopt regulations clarifying the provisions of
 this chapter, including the adoption of regulations for maintaining the quality and wholesomeness of the products offered for sale and promoting and fostering honest selling activities for those products.

(c) The secretary may enter into a cooperative agreement with a county agricultural commissioner to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, administration, investigations, inspections, registrations, and assistance pertaining to direct marketing producers and outlets. Compensation under the cooperative agreement shall be paid from assessments and fees collected and deposited pursuant to this chapter and shall provide reimbursement to the county agricultural commissioner for associated costs exclusive of the costs of certification and minimum inspections required pursuant to Section 47020.

(d) Upon reasonable suspicion of a violation of Section 890, a certified farmers’ market operator may contract with a county agricultural commissioner for a special onsite field or storage verification inspection of a direct marketing producer selling in a certified farmers’ market operated and controlled by the operator. All contracts and contract fees are subject to the discretion of the county agricultural commissioner in the county where the verification inspections are being requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (AB 2324)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

47002.

California farmers registered or certified pursuant to this chapter as direct marketing producers may transport for sale and sell California-grown fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables that they produce, directly to the public, and shall be exempt from size, standard pack, container, and labeling requirements at an outlet or location operated by an individual, organization, or entity that is regulated pursuant to this chapter or is recognized by a regulation adopted pursuant to Section 47001 and is otherwise authorized by local ordinances, subject to the following conditions:

(a) All fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables sold shall comply with the California Code of
 Regulations governing maturity and quality.

(b) No exemption granted by this section supersedes the provisions of federal marketing orders, state marketing orders, or any health and safety laws, regulations, or ordinances.

(c) All fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables sold in closed consumer containers shall be labeled with the name, address, and ZIP Code of the producer, and a declaration of identity and net quantity of the commodity in the package.

(d) If a farmer selling produce pursuant to this section implements any exemption to size, standard pack, container, or labeling requirements as provided by this section, those sales may only be conducted as direct sales to any of the following:

(1) Consumers who are end users.

(2) Individuals, organizations, or entities that subsequently sell the produce directly to end users.

(3) Individuals, organizations, or entities that distribute the produce directly to end users at no cost to those end users.

(e) A farmer selling produce under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) shall provide the individual, organization, or entity a memorandum that lists the identity of the producer, the address of the producer, and the identity and quantity of the produce purchased. A bill of sale or a container label including this information shall meet the requirements of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 6.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47003.

The secretary may establish qualifications for persons selling products directly to the public whenever the sales involve the use of any exemption granted by this chapter. Certified farmers’ markets and other direct marketing outlets and distributors may likewise be subject to qualifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 447, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Certified Farmers’ Markets [47004. - 47005.4.]

47004.

(a) Certified farmers’ markets are California agricultural product point-of-sale locations that are registered under the provisions of Section 47020 and operated in accordance with this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The operator of a certified farmers’ market shall establish a clearly defined marketing area where only agricultural products may be sold. Only the producer or the lawful authorized representative of the producer may sell agricultural products within the area defined as a certified farmers’ market. Sales of
 agricultural products purchased from another individual or entity shall not occur within a certified farmers’ market, and an agricultural product producer or product dealer shall not sell his or her agricultural products to another individual or entity with the understanding or knowledge that the products are intended to be resold in a certified farmers’ market in violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. Every producer selling within a certified farmers’ market shall comply with Section 47020.

(c) All vendors of agricultural products selling within a certified farmers’ market shall do all of the following:

(1) Post a conspicuous sign or banner at the point of sale that states the name of the farm or ranch, the county where the farm or ranch maintains the production grounds that produced the products being offered for sale is located, and a
 statement that “We Grew What We Are Selling” or “We Raised What We Are Selling” or “We Grow What We Sell” or similar phrases that clearly represent that the farm or ranch is only selling agricultural products that they themselves have grown or raised on California land that they possess or control. Product sales by different farms at the same vendor stand shall separate the products from each farm or ranch and correspondingly post the required sign or banner in direct relationship with the sales display of the products produced by each farm.

(2) Ensure that all processed agricultural products that they offer for sale state in a clear manner by package label, container label, or bulk sales signage that they consist only, with the exception of incidental flavorings and necessary preservatives, of agricultural products grown or raised by the farm or ranch selling them, the farm or ranch name, and the city where the farm or ranch is located. In
 addition, every processed product shall identify on a package label, container label, or on bulk sales signage the registration number or other identity reference of the facility where the food was processed, or another required labeling statement or information, in accordance with Sections 110460, 114365, and 114365.2 of the Health and Safety Code, or, in the case of meat or poultry products, the identity of the facility where the meat or poultry products were cut and wrapped, in accordance with the applicable United States Department of Agriculture or State of California inspection standards, or, in the case of dairy products, the identity of the facility where the dairy products were manufactured or processed.

(3) Ensure all products being represented or offered for sale as organic are clearly labeled or have conspicuous and posted point-of-sale signage identifying the products as organic.

(d) The representations required pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to the provisions and penalties specified in Section 890.

(e) An operator of a certified farmers’ market that also operates, manages, or otherwise controls a separate sales activity or vending event or marketing area in close proximity, adjacent, or contiguous to the operator’s certified farmers’ market shall not allow the sale or distribution of fresh whole fruits, nuts, vegetables, cultivated mushrooms, herbs, and flowers by vendors selling within those sales activity or vending event or marketing areas.

(f) The operator of a certified farmers’ market shall keep an accurate participation record of the individual direct marketing producers whose agricultural products were presented
 for sale in their market each market day. The operators shall submit to the department a quarterly report of the registration numbers and participation frequency of the direct marketing producers whose agricultural products were presented for sale in the operator’s market during that past quarter. The department shall create and maintain online capability for reporting.

(g) Operators of certified farmers’ markets may establish rules and procedures that are more restrictive and stringent than state laws or regulations governing or implementing this chapter, so long as the rules and procedures are not in conflict with state laws or regulations.

(h) Except for certified farmers’ markets operated by government agencies, nonprofit entities and other qualified operators of certified farmers’ markets shall be considered private entities and may take actions, adopt rules, and impose
 requirements they deem necessary for the proper and honest operation of their market, subject to the application of any state or other laws. Government agency operators of certified farmers’ markets are subject to applicable state laws, the regulations and laws of the governing agency, and other laws governing the conduct and actions they may take as a governmental entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 374, Sec. 5.   (AB 862)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

47005.

An enforcing officer may enter and inspect any place or conveyance where products are produced, stored, packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold pertaining to a certified producer’s certificate over which they have jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47005.1.

An enforcing officer may inspect all products, containers, and equipment found in any place or conveyance to determine compliance with this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder. The enforcing officer may also take representatives samples of products and containers, which may be subject to any method of inspection or testing as deemed necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47005.2.

An enforcing officer may seize and hold as evidence all or any part of any container, pack, load, bulk lot, consignment or shipment of products which is packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold to secure the conviction of the party the enforcing officer knows or believes has violated or is violating any provision of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47005.3.

Any evidence that is seized under the authority of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder by an enforcing officer in any county may be admitted into evidence in any action taken by any other county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47005.4.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to preclude the creation and keeping of additional information that a certified farmers’ market operator may endeavor itself to create and keep, or to contractually require a vendor to provide additional information as a condition to selling in the operator’s farmers’ market.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 384, Sec. 3.   (AB 2324)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.6. Certified Mobile Farmers’ Markets [47007. - 47009.]

47007.

(a) A “certified mobile farmers’ market” means a mobile food facility, as defined in Section 113831 of the Health and Safety Code, that moves to various California agricultural product point-of-sale locations at predetermined and regular intervals operated by a California producer, a local government agency, or a nonprofit organization that is incorporated in California, upon which agricultural products are sold or distributed at retail directly to communities, and is registered under the provisions of Section 47008 and operated in accordance with this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Certified mobile farmers’ market operators shall comply with
 all of the following:

(1) Sell or distribute agricultural products, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 47000.5, produced by a California producer with a valid certified producer’s certificate.

(2) Obtain from each producer an itemized list of all products purchased in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 47002.

(3) Ensure that all processed agricultural products being sold comply with the requirements set forth in Section 113735 of the Health and Safety Code, and the applicable provisions of Section 110460, 114365, or 114365.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Comply with all labeling and identification requirements for shell eggs and
 processed foods imposed pursuant to the provisions of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the farm’s name, physical address, and telephone number.

(5) Ensure all products being represented or offered for sale as organic are clearly labeled or have conspicuous and posted point-of-sale signage identifying the products as organic.

(c) The representations required pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be subject to the provisions and penalties specified in Section 890.

(d) This article shall not be construed to remove the responsibility of a certified mobile farmers’ market from obtaining all required permits, registrations, certificates, and licenses, including, but not limited to, a produce dealer license,
 a mobile food facility permit, a processed food permit, a cannery license, a shellfish handling and marketing certificate, an organic processed product registration, or any other requirement from the State Department of Public Health or local jurisdiction, or from complying with the requirements of the California Retail Food Code (Part 7 (commencing with Section 113700) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code) and local jurisdictions, including payment of all applicable fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 915, Sec. 2.   (AB 2786)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

47007.5.

(a) An enforcing officer may enter and inspect any place or conveyance where products are produced, stored, packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold pertaining to a certified mobile farmers’ market over which they have jurisdiction.

(b) An enforcing officer may inspect all documentation, products, containers, and equipment found in any place or conveyance to determine compliance with this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder. The enforcing officer may also take representative samples of products and containers, which may be subject to any method of inspection or testing as deemed necessary.

(c) An enforcing officer may seize and hold as
 evidence all or any part of any container, pack, load, bulk lot, consignment, or shipment of products that is packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold to secure the conviction of the party the enforcing officer knows, or believes, has violated, or is violating, this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder.

(d) Any evidence that is seized by an enforcing officer in any county under the authority of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder, may be admitted into evidence in any action taken by any other county.

(e) This chapter does not preclude the creation and keeping of additional information that a certified mobile farmers’ market operator may endeavor itself to create and keep, or contractually require a vendor to provide additional information as a condition to selling in an operator’s certified mobile farmers’
 market.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 198, Sec. 3.   (AB 1505)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47008.

An operator of a certified mobile farmers’ market shall register annually with the department as a certified mobile farmers’ market, which shall include all of the following:

(a) A statement specifying the location from where the agricultural products are sourced, including a certified farmers’ market or a certified producer with a valid certified producers’ certificate.

(b) A schedule of point-of-sale locations and expected sales intervals.

(c) All other required permitting related to the mobile food facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 915, Sec. 2.   (AB 2786)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

47009.

(a) The fee for, or the fee for amendment to, the annual registration of a certified mobile farmers’ market shall be set by regulation enacted by the secretary that is reflective of the actual cost of the processing of registration or amendment to the registration, but in no event shall either fee exceed two hundred dollars ($200) annually.

(b) Fees collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be used by the department for the administration of this article.

(c) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of any fee pursuant to this section shall not
 be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. An order to adopt, amend, or repeal regulations concerning the fee pursuant to this section shall be transmitted within 30 days by the secretary to the Office of Administrative Law. The Office of Administrative Law shall file the order promptly with the Secretary of State without further review pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The order shall do all of the following:

(1) Indicate that the regulations are adopted, amended, or repealed pursuant to this chapter.
